Tennessee, session 114, SB1574.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 3-6-302(a), is amended by deleting
"seven (7) days" wherever it appears in the subsection and substituting instead "seven (7)
business days".
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 3-6-302(c), is amended by deleting
"seven (7) days" and substituting instead "seven (7) business days".
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1574
010174
- 1 -